Maryland, session 2025, HB0515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–903.
(a) There is a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at retail,
at a club at the place described in the license, for on–premises consumption.
(c) The annual license fee is $480.
– 1 –

Ch. 782 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
11–1009.
(a) There is a Class C (veterans’ organization) license.
(b) The Board shall issue the license for use by a local unit of a nationwide
nonprofit organization or club that:
(1) is composed only of members who served in the armed forces of the
United States in a war in which the United States has been engaged;
(2) has a charter from a national veterans’ organization that was granted
before the application for the license was made;
(3) has a bona fide membership of at least 100 individuals and dues of at
least $5 per year per individual; and
(4) operates for its members and meets in a clubhouse principally used for
its members.
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at retail
at the place described in the license for on–premises consumption.
(d) The license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor during the hours and days
as set out for a Class C [beer, wine, and liquor] (VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) license
under § 11–2004 of this title.
(E) (1) A HOLDER OF A CLASS C BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
ISSUED UNDER § 11–903 OF THIS TITLE THAT QUALIFIES AS A VETERANS’
ORGANIZATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY APPLY TO CONVERT
THE LICENSE TO A CLASS C (VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) LICENSE.
(2) THE CONVERSION TO AND ISSUANCE OF A CLASS C (VETERANS’
ORGANIZATION) LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
CONSIDERED A LICENSE RENEWAL AND NOT AN ISSUANCE OF A NEW LICENSE.
[(e)] (F) (1) The annual license fee is [$400] $300.
(2) THE BOARD MAY PROVIDE APPLICATION AND ADMINISTRATIVE
FEE DISCOUNTS TO AN ORGANIZATION THAT:
(I) QUALIFIES AS A VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) 1. HOLDS A CLASS C (VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION)
LICENSE;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 782
2. APPLIES FOR AN INITIAL OR RENEWAL CLASS C
(VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) LICENSE; OR
3. HOLDS A CLASS C BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE
THAT IS CONVERTED TO A CLASS C (VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) LICENSE UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
11–2004.
(c) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A holder of a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license may sell beer, wine, and
liquor on Monday through Saturday from 6 a.m. to 2 a.m. the following day.
(2) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) of this
subsection, the license holder may not sell beer, wine, or liquor after 2 a.m. on Sunday.
(3) The Board may issue to the license holder a Sunday license that
authorizes the sale of beer, wine, and liquor on Sunday according to terms that the license
states.
(4) A HOLDER OF A CLASS C (VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) LICENSE
UNDER § 11–1009 OF THIS TITLE MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR ON MONDAY
THROUGH SUNDAY FROM 6 A.M. TO 2 A.M. THE FOLLOWING DAY WITHOUT
OBTAINING A SUNDAY LICENSE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(4)] (5) The license holder may sell or provide beer, wine, and liquor at a
bar or counter on any day on which the sale of beer, wine, and liquor is allowed by law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –